hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 ar		 emos		arvar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ascarar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		asear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		aspear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		astar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atatar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atiesar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atollar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		atuar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		autorizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		avar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		aviar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ayar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		azar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		balar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		baratar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		batojar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bautizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		berar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		biar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bijar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bilar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		billar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bitar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		blar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bletear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bolar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bonar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bonear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		borar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bordar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		borear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		borrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		botear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bozar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		brar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		brear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bromar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		bular
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cabestrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		calar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		calizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		callar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		calzar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		canar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		canear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		canizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cansar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cantar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		carear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		carrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		caucionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ccionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cebar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cedar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		celar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cendrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		centar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cepar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cerar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cerrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cesar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		char
SFX V		 ar		 emos		charolar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		chear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		chichear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		chinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		chuchear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ciar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cidar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ciguatar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ciliar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cionalizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		citar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cizañar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		clamar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		clar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		clavar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		clinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cocarar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cogollar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		colar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		colchar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		collar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		compadrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		conchar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		conciliar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		conear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		conectar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		corar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		corchar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cordelar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		coriar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cornar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cosar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cotizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ctar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cturar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cuestar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cuidar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cular
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cularizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cultar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		cunar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dalar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		delar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		descascarar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		diar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dillar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		diñar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ditar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		doctrinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dolar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		donar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dorar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dosar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dramatizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		dular
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ebar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ecentar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		echar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		eclinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ectar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		edar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ediar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		editar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		edrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		egrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		einar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ejar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ejear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		elar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		elizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ellar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		emar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		embotar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		embozar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ementar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		eminar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		emirar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		emnizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		empedrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		empezar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		emplazar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		empotrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		enar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		encallar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		encasquillar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		enciar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		endar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		endosar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		enerar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		engastar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		engranar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		enjaezar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		enjalmar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		enredar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ensar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		entar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		entear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		entrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		erar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		erchar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		erdear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		erear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		eriar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		erizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ermanar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ernar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ernizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		errar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		errear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ersar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ertar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ervar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		esar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		esdoblar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		esinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		esorar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		espabilar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		esposar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		espuntar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		estallar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		estar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		estear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		estrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		etar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		etear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		etillar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		etizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		etoñar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		eudar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		evar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		exionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ezar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		far
SFX V		 ar		 emos		fear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		fectar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		fiar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		filar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		filetear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		flamar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		flar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		flexionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		formar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		frar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		futar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		garbar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gastar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		genciar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		glomerar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gollar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gonear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gorgojar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gotar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gotear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gradar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		grafiar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		grar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gresar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		guazar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		guear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		guetear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		guindar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		gular
SFX V		 ar		 emos		habilitar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		hebrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		hechar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		hilar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		hinar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		hornar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		huchear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		huevar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		humar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ializar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ibar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ibiar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ichear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iciar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		icionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		icotear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		icular
SFX V		 ar		 emos		idar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ientar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iesar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ietar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ifar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		igrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iguar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ijar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ilar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ilatar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ilguar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iliar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ilitar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ilizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		illar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		illear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ilmar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		imar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		imbar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		imbrar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		imentar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iminar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		imizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		importar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		inar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iñar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		inchar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		indar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		inear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		inerar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		infectar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ingresar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		intar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		intear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iolar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ipar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iparar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iquear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		irar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		isar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		isionar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		isonar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		istar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		italizar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		itanear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		itar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		itear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		ivar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		izar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		iznar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		jadear
SFX V		 ar		 emos		jaezar
SFX V		 ar		 emos		jar
