hunspell/spanish.dic
abaratar/V
abejar/V
abociñar/V
abo/V
absorber/V
aburriar/V
acamparar/V
acarroñar/V
acercar/V
achucuyar/V
acoderar/V
acopar/V
acorriar/V
acrisolar/V
aculebrinar/V
adeudar/V
adoqueñir/V
adulzorar/V
afelpar/V
afuerar/V
agolparar/V
agridulzar/V
aguerrer/V
ahinojar/V
ajamonar/V
alabasar/V
alborar/V
aleccionar/V
alfilerar/V
alicerar/V
aljofar/V
alminar/V
alternar/V
amañer/V
ñamar/V
amigar/V
amoldar/V
amovir/V
amusgar/V
anejar/V
aniquilar/V
antedizar/V
antiguar/V
aojar/V
apantanar/V
apegualar/V
apilar/V
aplebeír/V
aporrir/V
aproar/V
aquear/V
archivarar/V
aridecir/V
arramblar/V
arrender/V
arrir/V
arrugar/V
ascendir/V
asestar/V
aspar/V
asurar/V
ataler/V
atasajar/V
atesar/V
atolondrar/V
atr/V
autarquir/V
auxiliar/V
avezar/V
azarasar/V
azularar/V
bagar/V
baldar/V
bancocracer/V
barbotar/V
barrocar/V
batear/V
becerrar/V
berlangar/V
bicornar/V
bilingar/V
bistrar/V
blasfemar/V
boger/V
borbolear/V
bo/V
brescar/V
brochar/V
bufar/V
buzacar/V
cablegrafr/V
caddiar/V
calamitar/V
californitar/V
calviciar/V
campstrar/V
canizar/V
capear/V
carambolar/V
carcomir/V
carmesiar/V
carvonar/V
castiguar/V
catir/V
cóclear/V
celebrantar/V
cenicentar/V
cercear/V
cer/V
chafallar/V
chapar/V
chascar/V
chicorrar/V
chismorrear/V
chucar/V
cierrar/V
cingalir/V
circunfir/V
cizallar/V
cloquear/V
coalcar/V
codelincuenciar/V
cohechar/V
colguar/V
columbrar/V
comisar/V
compasar/V
complexidar/V
computar/V
concibier/V
condecorar/V
confeder/V
congeniar/V
conmover/V
conspirar/V
containerar/V
contrabatir/V
contrafar/V
contrapesar/V
contristar/V
convivar/V
copiar/V
correar/V
costumbrar/V
cromolitógrafar/V
cubertar/V
culposar/V
dbar/V
decrecentar/V
delblar/V
deípar/V
desabreguir/V
desagregar/V
desancorar/V
desarrer/V
desautorizar/V
descalabrandar/V
descercar/V
descomprimar/V
descostar/V
desdramatizar/V
desemplear/V
desenfundar/V
desentarimir/V
desficer/V
deshilachar/V
deslechugar/V
desmdrar/V
desocupar/V
despavorir/V
despilfarrar/V
desprover/V
destetillar/V
desvalorar/V
detoñar/V
diarrear/V
dijar/V
discurrir/V
disponer/V
doler/V
duchar/V
electrotermir/V
embarbecer/V
embobir/V
embullar/V
empastelar/V
emplastecer/V
enaltecer/V
encandelar/V
encebar/V
encloquezar/V
encristalar/V
endurecer/V
enfurtar/V
engolfar/V
enjaquimar/V
enmaridar/V
enriscar/V
ensatar/V
entarimir/V
entrecortar/V
entrevr/V
envasar/V
equiditar/V
escalar/V
escindir/V
esculper/V
espaldonar/V
espír/V
estelar/V
estraperlear/V
etnir/V
exculpar/V
explosionar/V
extraditar/V
faldear/V
fatimer/V
fierabrar/V
flaqocer/V
forger/V
frangollar/V
fructificar/V
gañar/V
garbillar/V
gemiquear/V
glazar/V
gorronear/V
griposar/V
guardiañar/V
habituar/V
hazmerreír/V
heterotaler/V
hiperextensionar/V
hopir/V
hullir/V
iletrar/V
importar/V
incipentir/V
independizar/V
infrarrojar/V
inmiscr/V
insistir/V
intermediar/V
introducir/V
irisar/V
jaecer/V
jonjabar/V
kirsch/V
lamentar/V
lateralizar/V
lemosinar/V
licuefazar/V
listinar/V
lograr/V
macadamizar/V
magrurar/V
maliciar/V
maner/V
maorir/V
matar/V
melar/V
mermar/V
micurar/V
mistar/V
molinar/V
morar/V
movr/V
murizar/V
nasociliar/V
nimbir/V
novar/V
oboar/V
oficiar/V
opositar/V
oscilar/V
palabritar/V
panfletar/V
parcelar/V
pasar/V
pavimentar/V
pelechar/V
perdidizar/V
perseguir/V
pianísner/V
pintear/V
pizpiretar/V
plenar/V
polidispersar/V
porrar/V
potrerar/V
preconcebir/V
preliminar/V
presurizar/V
prodecir/V
promulgar/V
provenar/V
punar/V
quijar/V
racer/V
rarezar/V
reagalizar/V
rebrotar/V
rechacer/V
reconociar/V
recrear/V
redoblar/V
reforcir/V
regletear/V
reintegrar/V
rembolsar/V
remullir/V
repentir/V
repurgar/V
resiñir/V
resumer/V
retrepasar/V
revigorizar/V
rimayar/V
rodar/V
rubiar/V
sacabocar/V
salitrar/V
sanear/V
sazonar/V
semidespoblar/V
serícear/V
sicofantar/V
siracusanar/V
sobreentender/V
sofister/V
somorgucir/V
subarrer/V
substraar/V
suger/V
suprafluir/V
tabiar/V
tapetar/V
taumaturgir/V
temporizar/V
testimoniar/V
titular/V
tosistir/V
tranquilizar/V
trapalear/V
trasnombrar/V
trazumar/V
triálsinar/V
tríplizar/V
turcotártar/V
unciar/V
usurpar/V
variar/V
ventregar/V
viborear/V
ávir/V
vortizar/V
yuxtaponer/V
zenerar/V
